Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-617.05
Delayed birth certificate; application; fee; records required.

Each application for a certificate of delayed birth registration shall be accompanied by the fees required by subsection (1) of section 71-617.15 and three independent supporting records as provided in section 71-617.06, only one of which may be an affidavit of personal recollection from a person at least five years older than the applicant and having a personal knowledge of the facts at the time of birth. Any evidence used shall relate to the date and place of birth and at least one item of documentary evidence shall correctly establish parentage.

Laws 1985, LB 42, § 12;

Laws 2004, LB 1005, § 57.